Massachusetts, session 194th, S1262.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39 of Chapter 265 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is
hereby amended by striking in line 5 the word "five" and inserting in place thereof the
following:-"ten".
SECTION 2. Said section 39 of chapter 265 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is
hereby amended by striking in line 6 the words "in a house of correction" and inserting in place
thereof the following:- "state prison".
SECTION 3. Said section 39 of chapter 265 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is
hereby amended by striking in line 7 the words:-"two and one-half years" and inserting in place
thereof the following:-"five".
of 2

SECTION 4. Said section 39 of chapter 265 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is
hereby amended by striking in line 19 the word:-"ten" and inserting in place thereof the
following:-"twenty".
SECTION 5. Said section 39 of chapter 265 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is
hereby amended by striking in line 20 the word:- "five" and inserting in place thereof the
following:-"ten".
SECTION 6. Said section 39 of chapter 265 as appearing in the 2022 official edition is
hereby amended by striking in line 31 the word:- "one" and inserting in place thereof the
following:-"two".
of 2